Nevada, session 83, SB386.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 640C of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Board may, after conducting a review of the
credentials of an applicant who does not otherwise satisfy the
requirements set forth in NRS 640C.580, 640C.600 or 640C.620,
as applicable, issue a license to the applicant pursuant to this
section.
2. An applicant for a license to practice massage therapy,
reflexology or structural integration, as applicable, issued
pursuant to this section must:
(a) Have legally practiced massage therapy, reflexology or
structural integration in another state, territory or possession of
the United States or the District of Columbia for not less than 3
years; and
(b) Submit to the Board:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
(1) A completed application on a form prescribed by the
Board;
(2) The fees prescribed by the Board pursuant to
NRS 640C.520;
(3) A certified statement issued by the licensing authority in
each state, territory or possession of the United States or the
District of Columbia in which the applicant is or has been licensed
to practice massage therapy, reflexology or structural integration,
verifying that:
(I) The applicant has not been involved in any
disciplinary action relating to his or her license to practice
massage therapy, reflexology or structural integration, as
applicable; and
(II) Disciplinary proceedings relating to his or her
license to practice massage therapy, reflexology or structural
integration, as applicable, are not pending;
(4) A complete set of fingerprints and written permission
authorizing the Board to forward the fingerprints to the Central
Repository for Nevada Records of Criminal History for submission
to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for its report;
(5) A statement authorizing the Board or its designee to
conduct an investigation to determine the accuracy of any
statements set forth in the application; and
(6) Official transcripts from a program of massage therapy,
reflexology or structural integration which must demonstrate that
the applicant completed:
(I) For a program of massage therapy, not less than 500
hours of instruction;
(II) For a program of structural integration, not less
than 700 hours of instruction; and
(III) For a program of reflexology, not less than 200
hours of instruction.
3. In addition to any examination required pursuant to NRS
640C.320, an applicant for a license issued pursuant to this
section must pass a nationally recognized examination for testing
the education and professional competency of massage therapists,
reflexologists or structural integration practitioners, as applicable,
that is approved by the Board.
Sec. 2. NRS 640C.080 is hereby amended to read as follows:
640C.080 “Reflexology” means the application of a system of
pressure to the feet, ears , face and hands of the human body.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
Sec. 3. NRS 640C.180 is hereby amended to read as follows:
640C.180 1. At the first meeting of each fiscal year, the
members of the Board shall elect a Chair, Vice Chair and Secretary-
Treasurer from among the members.
2. The Board shall meet at least quarterly and may meet at
other times at the call of the Chair or upon the written request of a
majority of the members of the Board.
3. [The Board shall alternate the location of its meetings
between the southern district of Nevada and the northern district of
Nevada. For the purposes of this subsection:
(a) The southern district of Nevada consists of all that portion of
the State lying within the boundaries of the counties of Clark,
Esmeralda, Lincoln and Nye.
(b) The northern district of Nevada consists of all that portion of
the State lying within the boundaries of Carson City and the
counties of Churchill, Douglas, Elko, Eureka, Humboldt, Lander,
Lyon, Mineral, Pershing, Storey, Washoe and White Pine.
4.] A meeting of the Board may be conducted telephonically or
by videoconferencing. A meeting conducted telephonically or by
videoconferencing must meet the requirements of chapter 241 of
NRS and any other applicable provisions of law.
[5.] 4. Five members of the Board constitute a quorum for the
purposes of transacting the business of the Board, including, without
limitation, issuing, renewing, suspending, revoking or reinstating a
license issued pursuant to this chapter.
Sec. 4. NRS 640C.330 is hereby amended to read as follows:
640C.330 1. The Board shall adopt regulations that prescribe
the requirements for the certification and operation of a massage,
reflexology and structural integration establishment, including,
without limitation, the:
(a) Requirements for a massage, reflexology and structural
integration establishment to obtain a certificate;
(b) Standards with which a massage, reflexology and structural
integration establishment must comply; [and]
(c) Establishment of fees pursuant to NRS 640C.520 for the
issuance and renewal of a certification of a massage, reflexology
and structural integration establishment [.] ; and
(d) Grounds for the imposition of disciplinary action against a
holder of a certificate and the disciplinary actions which the
Board may impose, which may include, without limitation, the
imposition of a fine and the suspension or revocation of a
certificate.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
2. The provisions of this section and any regulations adopted
pursuant thereto do not prohibit a local government from licensing
and regulating a massage, reflexology and structural integration
establishment, including, without limitation, in a manner that is
more stringent than the regulations adopted by the Board pursuant to
this section.
3. Local governments have concurrent jurisdiction with the
Board over the licensure and regulation of massage, reflexology and
structural integration establishments.
4. If there is a conflict between a provision of the regulations
adopted by the Board pursuant to this section and a requirement of a
local government, the requirement of a local government prevails to
the extent that the requirement provides a more stringent or specific
requirement regarding the regulation of a massage, reflexology and
structural integration establishment.
5. As used in this section, “massage, reflexology and structural
integration establishment” means any premises, mobile unit,
building or part of a building where massage therapy, reflexology or
structural integration is practiced by a person or persons licensed
pursuant to this chapter.
Sec. 5. NRS 640C.580 is hereby amended to read as follows:
640C.580 1. The Board may issue a license to practice
massage therapy.
2. [An] Except as otherwise provided in section 1 of this act,
an applicant for a license must:
(a) Be at least 18 years of age;
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 640C.426, submit to
the Board:
(1) A completed application on a form prescribed by the
Board;
(2) The fees prescribed by the Board pursuant to
NRS 640C.520;
(3) Proof that the applicant has successfully completed a
program of massage therapy recognized by the Board;
(4) A certified statement issued by the licensing authority in
each state, territory or possession of the United States or the District
of Columbia in which the applicant is or has been licensed to
practice massage therapy verifying that:
(I) The applicant has not been involved in any
disciplinary action relating to his or her license to practice massage
therapy; and
(II) Disciplinary proceedings relating to his or her license
to practice massage therapy are not pending;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
(5) A complete set of fingerprints and written permission
authorizing the Board to forward the fingerprints to the Central
Repository for Nevada Records of Criminal History for submission
to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for its report; and
(6) A statement authorizing the Board or its designee to
conduct an investigation to determine the accuracy of any
statements set forth in the application; and
(c) In addition to any examination required pursuant to NRS
640C.320 and except as otherwise provided in NRS 640C.426, pass
a nationally recognized examination for testing the education and
professional competency of massage therapists that is approved by
the Board.
3. The Board:
(a) Shall recognize a program of massage therapy that is:
(1) Approved by the Commission on Postsecondary
Education; or
(2) Offered by a public college in this State or any other
state; and
(b) May recognize other programs of massage therapy.
4. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 640C.426, the Board
or its designee shall:
(a) Conduct an investigation to determine:
(1) The reputation and character of the applicant;
(2) The existence and contents of any record of arrests or
convictions of the applicant;
(3) The existence and nature of any pending litigation
involving the applicant that would affect his or her suitability for
licensure; and
(4) The accuracy and completeness of any information
submitted to the Board by the applicant.
(b) Report the results of the investigation of the applicant within
the period the Board establishes by regulation pursuant to
NRS 640C.320.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.0115, maintain the
results of the investigation in a confidential manner for use by the
Board and its members and employees in carrying out their duties
pursuant to this chapter. The provisions of this paragraph do not
prohibit the Board or its members or employees from
communicating or cooperating with or providing any documents or
other information to any other licensing board or any other federal,
state or local agency that is investigating a person, including,
without limitation, a law enforcement agency.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
Sec. 6. NRS 640C.600 is hereby amended to read as follows:
640C.600 1. The Board may issue a license to practice
reflexology.
2. [An] Except as otherwise provided in section 1 of this act,
an applicant for a license must:
(a) Be at least 18 years of age;
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 640C.426, submit to
the Board:
(1) A completed application on a form prescribed by the
Board;
(2) The fees prescribed by the Board pursuant to
NRS 640C.520;
(3) Proof that the applicant has successfully completed a
program of reflexology recognized by the Board;
(4) A certified statement issued by the licensing authority in
each state, territory or possession of the United States or the District
of Columbia in which the applicant is or has been licensed to
practice reflexology verifying that:
(I) The applicant has not been involved in any
disciplinary action relating to his or her license to practice
reflexology; and
(II) Disciplinary proceedings relating to his or her license
to practice reflexology are not pending;
(5) A complete set of fingerprints and written permission
authorizing the Board to forward the fingerprints to the Central
Repository for Nevada Records of Criminal History for submission
to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for its report; and
(6) A statement authorizing the Board or its designee to
conduct an investigation to determine the accuracy of any
statements set forth in the application; and
(c) In addition to any examination required pursuant to NRS
640C.320 and except as otherwise provided in NRS 640C.426, pass
a nationally recognized examination for testing the education and
professional competency of reflexologists that is approved by the
Board.
3. The Board:
(a) Shall recognize a program of reflexology that is:
(1) Approved by the Commission on Postsecondary
Education; or
(2) Offered by a public college in this State or any other
state; and
(b) May recognize other programs of reflexology.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
4. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 640C.426, the Board
or its designee shall:
(a) Conduct an investigation to determine:
(1) The reputation and character of the applicant;
(2) The existence and contents of any record of arrests or
convictions of the applicant;
(3) The existence and nature of any pending litigation
involving the applicant that would affect his or her suitability for
licensure; and
(4) The accuracy and completeness of any information
submitted to the Board by the applicant.
(b) Report the results of the investigation of the applicant within
the period the Board establishes by regulation pursuant to
NRS 640C.320.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.0115, maintain the
results of the investigation in a confidential manner for use by the
Board and its members and employees in carrying out their duties
pursuant to this chapter. The provisions of this paragraph do not
prohibit the Board or its members or employees from
communicating or cooperating with or providing any documents or
other information to any other licensing board or any other federal,
state or local agency that is investigating a person, including,
without limitation, a law enforcement agency.
Sec. 7. NRS 640C.620 is hereby amended to read as follows:
640C.620 1. The Board may issue a license to practice
structural integration.
2. [An] Except as otherwise provided in section 1 of this act,
an applicant for a license must:
(a) Be at least 18 years of age;
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 640C.426, submit to
the Board:
(1) A completed application on a form prescribed by the
Board;
(2) The fees prescribed by the Board pursuant to
NRS 640C.520;
(3) Proof that the applicant has successfully completed a
program of structural integration recognized by the Board;
(4) A certified statement issued by the licensing authority in
each state, territory or possession of the United States or the District
of Columbia in which the applicant is or has been licensed to
practice structural integration verifying that:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
(I) The applicant has not been involved in any
disciplinary action relating to his or her license to practice structural
integration; and
(II) Disciplinary proceedings relating to his or her license
to practice structural integration are not pending;
(5) A complete set of fingerprints and written permission
authorizing the Board to forward the fingerprints to the Central
Repository for Nevada Records of Criminal History for submission
to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for its report; and
(6) A statement authorizing the Board or its designee to
conduct an investigation to determine the accuracy of any
statements set forth in the application; and
(c) In addition to any examination required pursuant to NRS
640C.320 and except as otherwise provided in NRS 640C.426, pass
a nationally recognized examination for testing the education and
professional competency of structural integration practitioners that
is approved by the Board.
3. The Board:
(a) Shall recognize a program of structural integration that is:
(1) Approved by the Commission on Postsecondary
Education; or
(2) Offered by a public college in this State or any other
state; and
(b) May recognize other programs of structural integration.
4. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 640C.426, the Board
or its designee shall:
(a) Conduct an investigation to determine:
(1) The reputation and character of the applicant;
(2) The existence and contents of any record of arrests or
convictions of the applicant;
(3) The existence and nature of any pending litigation
involving the applicant that would affect his or her suitability for
licensure; and
(4) The accuracy and completeness of any information
submitted to the Board by the applicant.
(b) Report the results of the investigation of the applicant within
the period the Board establishes by regulation pursuant to
NRS 640C.320.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.0115, maintain the
results of the investigation in a confidential manner for use by the
Board and its members and employees in carrying out their duties
pursuant to this chapter. The provisions of this paragraph do not
prohibit the Board or its members or employees from
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
communicating or cooperating with or providing any documents or
other information to any other licensing board or any other federal,
state or local agency that is investigating a person, including,
without limitation, a law enforcement agency.
Sec. 8. NRS 640C.630 is hereby amended to read as follows:
640C.630 1. The Board may issue a temporary license to
practice massage therapy, reflexology or structural integration [.] in
this State to a person who holds an active license in good standing
to practice massage therapy, reflexology or structural integration
issued by another state, territory or possession of the United States
or the District of Columbia.
2. An applicant for a temporary license issued pursuant to this
section must [:
(a) Be at least 18 years of age; and
(b) Submit to the Board:
(1) A completed application on a form prescribed by the
Board;
(2) The fees prescribed by the Board pursuant to
NRS 640C.520;
(3) Proof that the applicant has successfully completed a
program of structural integration recognized by the Board pursuant
to NRS 640C.620;
(4) Proof that the applicant:
(I) Has taken the examination required pursuant to NRS
640C.620; or
(II) Is scheduled to take such an examination within 90
days after the date of application;
(5) An affidavit indicating that the applicant has not
committed any of the offenses for which the Board may refuse to
issue a license pursuant to NRS 640C.700;
(6) A certified statement issued by the licensing authority in
each state, territory or possession of the United States or the District
of Columbia in which the applicant is or has been licensed to
practice structural integration verifying that:
(I) The applicant has not been involved in any
disciplinary action relating to his or her license to practice structural
integration; and
(II) Disciplinary proceedings relating to his or her license
to practice structural integration are not pending; and
(7) A complete set of fingerprints and written permission
authorizing the Board to forward the fingerprints to the Central
Repository for Nevada Records of Criminal History for submission
to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for its report.] satisfy the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 11 –
requirements for the issuance of a temporary license set forth in
the regulations adopted by the Board pursuant to subsection 5.
3. A temporary license issued pursuant to this section expires
90 days after the date the Board issues the temporary license. The
Board shall not renew the temporary license. A person who has
been issued a temporary license pursuant to this section may apply
for a new temporary license not less than 3 months after the
expiration of the temporary license most recently issued to the
person.
4. A person who holds a temporary license:
(a) May practice massage therapy, reflexology or structural
integration , as applicable, only under the supervision of a fully
licensed massage therapist, fully licensed reflexologist or fully
licensed structural integration practitioner , as applicable, and only
in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and the regulations
of the Board;
(b) Must comply with any other conditions, limitations and
requirements imposed on the temporary license by the Board;
(c) Is subject to the regulatory and disciplinary authority of the
Board to the same extent as a fully licensed massage therapist, fully
licensed reflexologist or fully licensed structural integration
practitioner [;] , as applicable; and
(d) Remains subject to the regulatory and disciplinary authority
of the Board after the expiration of the temporary license for all acts
relating to the practice of massage therapy, reflexology or structural
integration , as applicable, which occurred during the period of
temporary licensure.
5. The Board shall adopt regulations to carry out the
provisions of this section, including, without limitation,
regulations establishing requirements for the issuance of a
temporary license. Such regulations must not require an applicant
for the issuance of a temporary license to take or pass a written
examination concerning his or her qualifications to practice
massage therapy, reflexology or structural integration to be issued
a temporary license.
6. As used in this section [, “fully] :
(a) “Fully licensed massage therapist” means a person who
holds a license to practice massage therapy issued pursuant to
NRS 640C.420 or 640C.580.
(b) “Fully licensed reflexologist” means a person who holds a
license to practice reflexology issued pursuant to NRS 640C.420
or 640C.600.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 12 –
(c) “Fully licensed structural integration practitioner” means a
person who holds a license to practice structural integration issued
pursuant to NRS 640C.420 or 640C.620.
Sec. 9. NRS 640C.750 is hereby amended to read as follows:
640C.750 1. The Board may conduct investigations and hold
hearings to carry out its duties pursuant to this chapter.
2. In such a hearing:
(a) Any member of the Board may administer oaths and
examine witnesses; and
(b) The Board , the Executive Director of the Board or any
member [thereof] of the Board may issue subpoenas to compel the
attendance of witnesses and the production of books and papers.
3. Each witness who is subpoenaed to appear before the Board
is entitled to receive for his or her attendance the same fees and
mileage allowed by law for a witness in a civil case. The amount
must be paid by the party who requested the subpoena. If any
witness who has not been required to attend at the request of any
party is subpoenaed by the Board, his or her fees and mileage must
be paid by the Board from money available for that purpose.
4. If any person fails to comply with the subpoena within 10
days after it is issued, the Chair of the Board may petition a court of
competent jurisdiction for an order of the court compelling
compliance with the subpoena.
5. Upon the filing of such a petition, the court shall enter an
order directing the person subpoenaed to appear before the court at a
time and place to be fixed by the court in its order, the time to be not
more than 10 days after the date of the order, and to show cause why
the person has not complied with the subpoena. A certified copy of
the order must be served upon the person subpoenaed.
6. If it appears to the court that the subpoena was regularly
issued by the Board, the court shall enter an order compelling
compliance with the subpoena. The failure of the person to comply
with the order is a contempt of the court that issued the order.
Sec. 10. NRS 640C.930 is hereby amended to read as follows:
640C.930 1. A person shall not advertise as a massage
therapist, reflexologist or structural integration practitioner in this
State unless the person is licensed to practice massage therapy,
reflexology or structural integration pursuant to this chapter.
2. A person licensed to practice massage therapy, reflexology
or structural integration pursuant to this chapter shall not
disseminate, as part of any advertising by the massage therapist,
reflexologist or structural integration practitioner, any false or
misleading statement or representation of material fact that is
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 13 –
intended, directly or indirectly, to induce another person to use the
services of the massage therapist, reflexologist or structural
integration practitioner.
3. All advertising by a licensed massage therapist, reflexologist
or structural integration practitioner must include his or her name
and the name of his or her company, if applicable. All advertising in
a telephone directory or a newspaper must also include the number
of the license.
4. A person shall not advertise a massage, reflexology and
structural integration establishment in this State unless the person
holds a certificate to operate the massage, reflexology and
structural integration establishment issued by the Board pursuant
to NRS 640C.330.
5. A person who holds a certificate to operate a massage,
reflexology and structural integration establishment shall not
disseminate, as part of any advertising by the person holding the
certificate, any false or misleading statement or representation of
material fact that is intended, directly or indirectly, to induce
another person to use the services of the massage, reflexology and
structural integration establishment.
6. All advertising by a person who holds a certificate to
operate a massage, reflexology and structural integration
establishment must include his or her name and the name of the
massage, reflexology and structural integration establishment. All
advertising in a telephone directory or a newspaper must also
include the number of the certificate to operate the massage,
reflexology and structural integration establishment.
7. A person who violates any provision of subsection 1 , [or] 2
, 4 or 5 is guilty of a misdemeanor.
[5.] 8. If, after notice and a hearing as required by law, the
Board determines that a person has willfully engaged in advertising
in a manner that violates the provisions of this section or NRS
640C.910, the Board may, in addition to any penalty, punishment or
disciplinary action authorized by the provisions of this chapter,
order the person to cease and desist the unlawful advertising. The
provisions of this subsection do not apply to any person whose
license has been expired for less than 90 days or is temporarily
suspended.
[6.] 9. The Board may order any person convicted of a crime
involving violence, prostitution or any other sexual offense to cause
any telephone number included in the advertising to be disconnected
from service. If the Board orders the person to cause any telephone
number to be disconnected from service and the person fails to
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 14 –
comply within 5 days after the date on which the person is served
with the order, the Board may:
(a) If the provider is regulated by the Public Utilities
Commission of Nevada, request the Commission to order the
provider to disconnect the telephone number from service pursuant
to NRS 703.175 and 707.355; or
(b) If the provider is not regulated by the Public Utilities
Commission of Nevada, request the provider to disconnect the
telephone number from service and inform the provider that the
request is made pursuant to this section. Upon receiving such a
request, the provider shall take such action as is necessary to
disconnect the telephone number from service.
[7.] 10. A provider shall not:
(a) Forward or offer to forward the telephone calls of a
telephone number disconnected from service pursuant to this
section; or
(b) Provide or offer to provide a message that includes a new
telephone number for the person whose telephone number was
disconnected from service pursuant to this section.
[8.] 11. If a provider complies in good faith with a request to
disconnect a telephone number from service pursuant to this section,
such good-faith compliance shall constitute a complete defense to
any civil or criminal action brought against the provider arising
from the disconnection or termination of service.
[9.] 12. As used in this section:
(a) “Advertising” means the intentional placement or issuance of
any sign, card or device, or the permitting or allowing of any sign or
marking on a motor vehicle, in any building, structure, newspaper,
magazine or airway transmission, on the Internet or in any directory
under the listing of “massage therapist,” “massage,” “reflexologist,”
“reflexology,” “structural integration [practitioner” or]
practitioner,” “structural [integration.”] integration” or “massage,
reflexology and structural integration establishment.”
(b) “Massage, reflexology and structural integration
establishment” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 640C.330.
(c) “Provider” means a provider of any type of telephone,
messaging or paging service.
[(c)] (d) “Provider of messaging or paging service” means an
entity that provides any type of messaging or paging service to any
type of communication device.
[(d)] (e) “Provider of telephone service” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 707.355.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 15 –
[(e)] (f) “Telephone number” means any sequence of numbers
or characters, or both, used by a provider to provide any type of
telephone, messaging or paging service.
Sec. 11. NRS 640C.590 and 640C.610 are hereby repealed.
Sec. 12. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 11, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On October 1, 2025, for all other purposes.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)